Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.430

Offenders—Postrelease arrest.

Any offender released under RCW 9.95.420, * 10.95.030(3), or 9.94A.730 who is arrested and detained in physical custody by the authority of a community corrections officer, or upon the written order of the board, shall not be released from custody on bail or personal recognizance, except upon approval of the board and the issuance by the board of an order reinstating the offender's release on the same or modified conditions. All chiefs of police, marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of counties, and all police, prison, and peace officers and constables shall execute any such order in the same manner as any ordinary criminal process.

[ 2014 c 130 s 6; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 308.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 10.95.030 was amended by 2023 c 102 s 20, changing subsection (3) to subsection (2).

Application—Effective date—2014 c 130: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.